Utah statutes.
23-23-7.5.   Landowner association to provide comparable hunting opportunities.

A landowner association shall provide each holder of an authorization or permit a comparable hunting opportunity in terms of hunting area and number of days.



Enacted by Chapter 258, 1997 General Session

